Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-422
Citation in lieu of arrest; legislative intent.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State of Nebraska to issue citations in lieu of arrest or continued custody to the maximum extent consistent with the effective enforcement of the law and the protection of the public. In furtherance of that policy, except as provided in sections 26-119 and 26-120, any peace officer shall be authorized to issue a citation in lieu of arrest or continued custody for any offense which is a traffic infraction, any other infraction, or a misdemeanor and for any violation of a city or village ordinance. Such authorization shall be carried out in the manner specified in sections 29-422 to 29-429 and 60-684 to 60-686.

Laws 1974, LB 829, § 1;

Laws 1978, LB 808, § 6;

Laws 1985, LB 19, § 2;

Laws 1989, LB 330, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB289, § 12;

Laws 2025, LB80, § 37.